California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(H) Responding to real property assessment appeals pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 1601).

(I) Conducting property tax audits pursuant to Sections 469 and 470.

(2) Procuring office space for staff hired pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Procuring office supplies and related items for staff hired pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Procuring information technology systems and software to assist with the activities specified in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1) by increasing efficiencies and effectiveness of property tax administration, and allowing for appropriate utilization of Program funds.

(e) County
 assessors’ offices that elect to apply to participate in the Program shall do all of the following on or before September 1, 2018:

(1) Transmit to the department a resolution of the county board of supervisors that states that the county agrees to provide the county assessor’s office with matching funds as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(2) Submit to the department an application, in the form and manner specified by the department. The department may reject applications not received by September 1, 2018. At a minimum, the application shall include the following:

(A) The number of budgeted, permanent positions in the 2017–18 fiscal year, as the county assessor will report that number to the State Board of Equalization for purposes of the publication titled “A Report on Budgets, Workloads, and
 Assessment Appeals Activities in California Assessors’ Offices,” hereinafter referred to as the “report” in this section.

(B) The additional staff the county assessor will fund using Program funds or matching county funds, or both Program funds and matching county funds.

(C) The total assessed value of county-assessed property in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(D) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by assessing and enrolling newly constructed property in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate, including the following:

(i) The number of new construction assessments completed in the 2017–18 fiscal year, as the assessor will report that number to the State Board of
 Equalization for purposes of the report, and the number of those assessments that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year by assessing and enrolling the newly constructed property.

(E) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by reassessing real property that has changed ownership. This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of real property change in ownership assessments completed in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those assessments that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the
 Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year through the assessment of real property that has changed ownership.

(F) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by processing real property supplemental assessments. This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of real property supplemental assessments completed in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those assessments that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county
 property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year through real property supplemental assessments.

(G) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by reassessing modified existing real property. This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of modified existing real property reassessments completed in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those reassessments that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year by reassessing modified existing real property.

(H) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by assessing real and personal property that has escaped assessment. This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of assessments of real and personal property that had previously escaped assessment completed in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those assessments that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year through the assessment of real and personal property that had previously escaped assessment.

(I) The estimated value that the staff identified
 in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by reassessing to current market value real property for which the county assessor previously reduced the assessed valuation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution. This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of reassessments to current market value of those real properties for which the county assessor previously reduced the assessed valuation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution completed in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those reassessments that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar
 value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year by reassessing to current market value those real properties for which the county assessor previously reduced the assessed valuation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(J) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by discovering unassessed real and personal property. This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of unassessed real and personal properties discovered in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those properties that the assessor expects to discover in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year by discovering unassessed real and personal properties.

(K) The estimated number of assessment appeals that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will resolve in accordance with subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d). This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of assessment appeals resolved by the county assessor’s office in the 2017–18 fiscal year, as that number will be reported to the State Board of Equalization for purposes of the report.

(ii) The dollar value retained on the property tax roll by the county assessor’s office staff in the 2017–18 fiscal
 year by resolving assessment appeals.

(iii) The dollar value that the county assessor’s office expects to retain on the property tax roll by resolving assessment appeals in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(L) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (B) will add to the county property tax roll by performing property tax audits pursuant to Sections 469 and 470. This information shall be provided for each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and shall include the following:

(i) The number of property tax audits completed pursuant to Sections 469 and 470 in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and the number of those audits that the assessor expects to complete in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate.

(ii) The dollar value added to the county property tax roll in the 2017–18 fiscal year by conducting property tax audits pursuant to Sections 469 and 470.

(M) The number of assessment tasks specified in subparagraphs (D) to (J), inclusive, that will be completed with Program-funded information technology systems and software in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and the dollar value that will be added to the property tax roll in each fiscal year as a result.

(N) The amount of Program funds and county matching funds that the county assessor proposes to expend for the purposes identified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (d).

(f) The department shall review the applications submitted pursuant to subdivision (e), select the Program
 participants, and notify the participants of their selection no later than October 1, 2018. No later than October 10, 2018, and each subsequent September 1 in fiscal years for which the annual Budget Act appropriates funds for the Program, the department shall instruct the office of the State Controller to remit the appropriate sum to each participating county.

(g) No later than August 10, 2019, and each subsequent August 10 in fiscal years for which the Program is authorized to operate, each participating county assessor’s office shall report the following information to the Department of Finance in the form and manner specified by the Department of Finance:

(1) The matching funds provided by the county in the fiscal year.

(2) The number of staff employed by the county assessor’s office in the preceding fiscal
 year.

(3) The number of staff identified pursuant to paragraph (2) whose positions were fully funded using Program funds or county matching funds, or both Program funds and county matching funds.

(4) The total value of county-assessed property in the preceding fiscal year.

(5) (A) The number of newly constructed properties assessed and enrolled in the preceding fiscal year as that number will be reported to the State Board of Equalization for purposes of the report and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of assessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(6) (A) The number of reassessments performed for real property that changed ownership in the preceding fiscal year and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of reassessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(7) (A) The number of supplemental assessments performed in the preceding fiscal year and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of supplemental assessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(8) (A) The number of reassessments performed in the preceding fiscal year for existing modified real property and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of reassessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(9) (A) The number of assessments performed in the preceding fiscal year for real and personal property that had previously escaped assessment and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of assessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax
 roll.

(10) (A) The number of properties reassessed to current market value subsequent to the county assessor having previously reduced their assessed valuations pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution in the preceding fiscal year and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of reassessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(11) (A) The number of unassessed properties discovered and enrolled in the preceding fiscal year and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(B) The number of
 assessments specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(12) (A) The number of assessments appeals successfully responded to in the preceding fiscal year and the dollar value retained on the property tax roll as a result. For purposes of this paragraph, “successfully responded to” means that the assessment appeals board did not reduce the assessed value to that claimed by the person seeking a reduction in the assessment.

(B) The number of assessment appeals specified in this paragraph that were responded to by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value retained on the property tax roll.

(13) (A) The number of additional tax audits completed in
 the preceding fiscal year and the dollar value added to the property tax roll as a result. For purposes of this paragraph, “additional tax audits” means the number of tax audits in excess of the volume of pool audits required by Section 469.

(B) The number of audits specified in this paragraph that were performed by the staff identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(14) The number of assessment tasks specified in paragraphs (5) through (11), inclusive, that were completed with Program-funded information technology systems and software in each fiscal year that the Program is authorized to operate and the dollar value added to the property tax roll.

(h) Upon the request of the department, participating county assessors’ offices shall provide the department with any
 supplemental information necessary to substantiate the information contained in the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (g).

(i) No later than March 1, 2022, the Department of Finance shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee with a report that, at a minimum, includes the following information, organized by county, for each fiscal year for which Program funding was appropriated in the annual Budget Act:

(1) The total assessed value of county-assessed property and the dollar amount by which that figure increased or decreased in comparison to the preceding fiscal year.

(2) The assessed value added to the property tax roll by all county assessor’s office staff for each of the activities specified in paragraphs (5) through (13), inclusive, of subdivision (g).

(3) A determination as to how much of the assessed value added to the property tax roll for each activity specified in paragraph (2) is attributable to county assessor’s office staff whose positions were fully funded using Program funds or county matching funds, or both Program funds and county matching funds.

(4) The amount by which the assessed values derived pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) increased or decreased in comparison to the preceding fiscal year.

(5) A determination as to the assessed value added to the property tax roll for each activity specified in paragraphs (5) through (13), inclusive, of subdivision (g) using Program-funded information technology systems and software.

(6) An estimate of the countywide property tax revenue resulting from
 the assessed value added to the property tax roll as determined pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (5).

(7) An estimate of the amount of revenue identified in paragraph (6) that accrued to the following entities:

(A) K–12 school districts.

(B) California Community College districts.

(C) County offices of education.

(8) A determination as to whether the Program resulted in assessed value increases that would not have otherwise occurred.

(j) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a compelling public interest in allowing the department to implement and administer this section as expeditiously as possible, and to thereby
 accelerate countywide equalization efforts. The department is therefore exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) for the purpose of carrying out the duties enumerated in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 53.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

95.60.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to assist county assessors in performing property assessments with technology investments.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Authority” means a county assessor’s joint powers authority.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Finance.

(3) “Lead county” means a county designated by the department to accept program funds on behalf of an authority.

(4) “Program” means the County Assessors’ Grant Program, as established by this section.

(c) (1) There is hereby established the County Assessors’ Grant Program, which shall be operative from July 1, 2022, to June 30, 2025, inclusive.

(2) The program shall be administered by the Department of Finance.

(3) Program funds shall be granted in a particular fiscal year only upon appropriation by the Legislature for the program in that fiscal year. However, an authority shall comply with the
 reporting requirement described in subdivision (g), regardless of appropriation, if the authority received program funds in the fiscal year preceding the report.

(d) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, a county assessor’s joint powers authority may apply to the department, in the form and manner specified by the department. The application may also be in the form of a memorandum of understanding between the department and the authority.

(1) The application or memorandum of understanding shall be due to the department by October 1, 2022.

(2) (A) The department shall complete its review of an application or memorandum of understanding no later than November 1, 2022. The department shall approve the application or memorandum of understanding if it meets at least the following criteria:

(i) A request for information technology-appropriate projects and programs related to the administration of the property tax system that includes the goals the authority seeks to achieve with the program funds.

(ii) A description of the deliverables the authority will procure with the program funds, and a description of how those deliverables will be used to achieve the goals described in clause (i).

(iii) A timeline for the completion of the deliverables specified in clause (ii) and for the achievement of the goals specified in clause (i).

(iv) An assurance that all county assessors’ offices that request to participate in the projects and programs funded by the program will be afforded the opportunity to do so.

(B) If an application or a memorandum of understanding that is missing any of the information described in clause (i) to (iv), inclusive of subparagraph (A), the department shall notify the applicant and the applicant shall provide the missing information within 15 days of notification. If the applicant fails to provide the missing information within the time period, the department shall deny the application or memorandum of understanding.

(3) Upon approval, by November 15, 2022, the department shall determine the grant amount and shall notify the State Controller’s Office to remit payment to the lead county.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, if the department denies an application or memorandum, the department may approve a revised application or memorandum submitted by the authority and modify the dates described in this subdivision as appropriate.

(e) Upon receipt of the program funds, an authority shall, in the 2022–23 fiscal year and 30 days prior to expending any funds appropriated for the program, provide the department with a copy of all contracts executed with third-party entities for implementing or operating the program.

(f) (1) An authority that receives funding in the 2022–23 fiscal
 year shall not be required to reapply for program funds for the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years if the 2023 and 2024 Budget Acts each contain a ten million dollar ($10,000,000) appropriation for purposes of the program.

(2) The department may require the authority to submit an amended application or memorandum of understanding for the 2023–24 or 2024−25 fiscal years if the Budget Act for that fiscal year does not provide an appropriation for the program or if the appropriation is an amount other than ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(3) Program funds shall be remitted to the authority, if an application or memorandum is approved, by November 15, 2023, for the 2023–24 fiscal year and November 15, 2024, for the 2024–25 fiscal year. However, funds may be remitted at a later date, as appropriate, if an application or memorandum is not approved by November 1, 2023, or November 1,
 2024, as applicable.

(g) No later than October 1, 2023, and each October 1 thereafter until October 1, 2025, an authority that receives program funds shall report the following information to the department, in the form and manner specified by the department:

(1) The total amount of program funds expended by the authority in the preceding fiscal year.

(2) A description of the purposes for which program funds were expended in the preceding fiscal year, and the associated deliverables received by the authority or the participating counties.

(3) A description of how the deliverables specified in paragraph (2) are in furtherance of the goals specified in the authority’s program application or memorandum of understanding.

(4) A description of whether the authority is meeting the timeline specified in its application or memorandum of understanding.

(5) Any corrections or changes to the information reported in the preceding annual reports, if any, and the reasons for those corrections or changes.

(6) Upon the request of the department, the authority shall provide any supplemental information necessary to clarify the information contained in a report submitted pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 53.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Basic Revenue Allocations [96. - 96.81.]

96.

For the 1979–80 fiscal year only, property tax revenues shall be apportioned to each jurisdiction pursuant to this section and Section 96.2 or their predecessors by the county auditor, subject to the allocation and payment of funds as provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, as follows:

(a) For each tax rate area, each local agency shall be allocated an amount of property tax revenue equal to the sum of the amount of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to Section 26912 of the Government Code to each local agency for the 1978–79 fiscal year, as allocated to that tax rate area pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of former Section 98, modified by any adjustments required by Section 99, and the amount of state assistance payments allocated to that tax rate area pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 96.5.

(b) The auditor shall determine the school entities’ share of the 1979–80 property tax revenue by subtracting the state assistance payments allocated to local agencies within the county for the 1978–79 fiscal year from the aggregate amount of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to Section 26912 of the Government Code to all school entities within the county for the 1978–79 fiscal year. The amount of the difference shall be the school entities’ share of property taxes for fiscal year 1979–80, and shall be allocated to the school entities in the same proportion as the allocation made to those entities for the 1978–79 fiscal year. The amount for each school entity shall be allocated among its tax rate areas pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 96.5.

(c) The difference between the total amount of property tax revenue and the amounts allocated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be allocated pursuant to Section 96.5.

(d) For the purposes of computing property tax allocations for the 1978–79 fiscal year and each year thereafter, the county auditor shall recompute the 1978–79 property tax allocation for any city that levied a utility users’ tax prior to 1978 but repealed that tax prior to December 31, 1977. For these cities, the term “property tax revenues for the 1975–76, 1976–77, and 1977–78 fiscal years” shall be deemed to include the aggregate of property tax and utility users’ tax for those respective years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

96.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 97), and in Article 4 (commencing with Section 98), for the 1980–81 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, property tax revenues shall be apportioned to each jurisdiction pursuant to this section and Section 96.2 by the county auditor, subject to allocation and payment of funds as provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 53395.8 of the Government Code, to each jurisdiction in the following manner:

(1) For each tax rate area, each jurisdiction shall be allocated an amount of property tax revenue equal to
 the amount of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this chapter to each jurisdiction in the prior fiscal year, modified by any adjustments required by Section 99 or 99.02.

(2) The difference between the total amount of property tax revenue and the amounts allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be allocated pursuant to Section 96.5, and shall be known as the “annual tax increment.”

(3) For purposes of this section, the amount of property tax revenue referred to in paragraph (1) shall not include amounts generated by the increased assessments under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75).

(b) Any allocation of property tax revenue that was subjected to a prior completed audit by the Controller, pursuant to the requirements of Section 12468 of the Government Code, where all findings have been resolved,
 shall be deemed correct.

(c) (1) Guidelines for legislation implementation issued and determined necessary by the State Association of County Auditors, and when adopted as regulations by either the Controller or the Department of Finance pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, shall be considered an authoritative source deemed correct until some future clarification by legislation or court decision.

(2) If a county auditor knowingly does not follow the guidelines referred to in paragraph (1), that county auditor shall inform the Controller of the reason or reasons for not following the guidelines. If the Controller disagrees with the stated reason or reasons for not following the guidelines, the provisions of paragraph (3) do not apply.

(3)
 If, by audit begun on or after July 1, 2001, or discovery by an entity on or after July 1, 2001, it is determined that an allocation method is required to be adjusted and a reallocation is required for previous fiscal years, the cumulative reallocation or adjustment may not exceed 1 percent of the total amount levied at a 1-percent rate of the current year’s original secured tax roll. The reallocation shall be completed in equal increments within the following three fiscal years, or as negotiated with the Controller in the case of reallocation to the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund or school entities.

(4) If it is determined that an allocation method is required to be adjusted as provided in paragraph (3), the county auditor shall, in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which this determination is made, correct the allocation method in accordance with statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 664, Sec. 4.   (AB 1199)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

96.11.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for purposes of property tax revenue allocations, the county auditor of a county for which a negative sum was calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of former Section 97.75 as that section read on September 19, 1983, shall, in reducing the amount of property tax revenue that otherwise would be allocated to the county by an amount attributable to that negative sum, do all of the following:

(a) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, apply a reduction amount that is equal to the lesser of either of the following:

(1) The reduction amount that was determined for the 2010–11 fiscal year.

(2) The reduction amount that is determined for the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(b) For the 2012–13 fiscal year, apply a reduction amount that is equal to the lesser of either of the following:

(1) The reduction amount that was determined in subdivision (a) for the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(2) The reduction amount that is determined for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(c) For the 2013–14 fiscal year and for the 2014–15 fiscal year, apply a reduction amount that is determined on the basis of the reduction amount applied for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(d) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the county auditor shall
 not apply a reduction amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 325, Sec. 24.   (SB 107)   Effective September 22, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

96.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the event a qualifying city as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 98 or subdivision (f) of Section 98.02 becomes the successor agency to a special district as a result of a merger described in Section 57087.3 of the Government Code, the auditor shall allocate to that qualifying city, in addition to any other amount of ad valorem property tax revenue required to be allocated to that city pursuant to this chapter, the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that otherwise would be allocated to that district pursuant to this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to confirm and clarify a county auditor’s duty and authority, established by subdivision (d) of Section 57087.3 of the Government Code, to allocate to a qualifying city the ad valorem property tax revenue of a subsidiary district that has been merged with the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

96.16.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, in the County of Orange, for the 1996–97 fiscal year, the amount of property tax revenue deemed allocated in the prior fiscal year to a flood control district or a harbors, beaches and parks fund shall be reduced by four million dollars ($4,000,000) each, and the amount of property tax revenue deemed allocated in the prior fiscal year to the county shall be increased by an amount equal to the combined amount of those reductions. For each of the 1997–98 to 2015–16 fiscal years, inclusive, the auditor shall allocate property tax revenues in those amounts that fully reflect the modifications required by the preceding sentence.

(b) For the 2016–17 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the auditor shall allocate property tax revenues in those amounts that would be determined if subdivision (a) had not applied to any prior fiscal year.

(c) This section shall not take effect unless and until (1) a plan of adjustment is confirmed in Case No. SA-94-22272-JR in the United States Bankruptcy Court for the Central District of California or (2) a trustee is appointed pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 30400) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 745, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

96.165.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for each fiscal year for which this section is operative, the auditor for a county of the second class shall determine those amounts of ad valorem property tax revenue deemed allocated in the prior fiscal year to jurisdictions within that county in those amounts that would be determined if all of the following were true:

(1) Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 1995 had not been enacted.

(2) The amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated in the 1995–96 fiscal year to a flood control district or a harbors, beaches, and parks fund was reduced by four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(3) The amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated in the 1995–96 fiscal year was increased by the total amount of the reductions specified by paragraph (2).

(b) (1) For the fiscal year after the last fiscal year for which this section is operative, the auditor for a county of the second class shall allocate ad valorem property tax revenues to jurisdictions within the county in those amounts that would be determined if subdivision (a) had never applied to any preceding fiscal year.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no action shall be taken pursuant to this section that adversely affects any flood control project with respect to the Santa Ana River.

(c) This section is operative for each fiscal year beginning after the date on which a court of appellate jurisdiction renders a final determination invalidating Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 1995, and is inoperative for each fiscal year beginning after the date on which the Department of Finance determines that the amounts of property tax revenue transfers to a county of the second class made pursuant to Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 1995, and not repaid, together with the amounts of property tax revenue transfers to a county of the second class made pursuant to this section, equal the amounts of property tax revenue transfers to a county of the second class that would have been made pursuant to Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 1995 had it remained in full force and effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 724, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

96.18.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Auditor for the County of San Diego shall, in allocating ad valorem property tax revenues in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 96.1 in each of the 1999–2000, 2000–01, and 2001–02 fiscal years, do both of the following:

(A) Decrease the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise deemed allocated to the County of San Diego in the prior fiscal year by an amount, not to exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000), as specified in an ordinance or resolution as described in subdivision (b).

(B) Increase the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise deemed allocated to the county free library in the prior fiscal year by an amount equal to the amount of the decrease required by subparagraph (A).

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in each of the 1999–2000, 2000–01, and 2001–02 fiscal years only, the auditor shall allocate the “annual tax increment” pursuant to Section 96.5 in those amounts that would be so allocated if no reduction or increase had been required in any fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1). In the 2002–03 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the auditor shall allocate the “annual tax increment” pursuant to Section 96.5 in those amounts that fully reflect any increase or decrease required in any fiscal year by paragraph (1).

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not become operative unless the Board of Supervisors for the County of San Diego adopts, with the approval of a majority of its entire membership, an ordinance or resolution declaring that the subdivision is operative. Any ordinance or resolution that is adopted pursuant to the preceding sentence shall do both of the following:

(1) Specify either the amount that is to be reallocated in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) in each fiscal year described in that subdivision, or a procedure for determining that reallocation amount for each of those same fiscal years.

(2) Prohibit the total of the amounts reallocated in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) from exceeding nine million dollars ($9,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 824, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

96.19.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the property tax apportionment factors applied in allocating property tax revenues in the County of Riverside for each fiscal year to the 1999–2000 fiscal year, inclusive, are deemed to be correct. However, for the 2000–01 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, property tax apportionment factors applied in allocating property tax revenues in the County of Riverside shall be determined on the basis of property tax apportionment factors for prior fiscal years that have been fully corrected and adjusted, pursuant to the review and recommendation of the Controller, as would be required in the absence of the preceding sentence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

96.2.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 96.21 or 96.22, for the purpose of apportioning property tax revenues each fiscal year:

(a) The amount of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 96 or subdivision (a) of Section 96.1, modified by any adjustments made pursuant to Section 99 or 99.2 and subdivision (e) of Section 96.5, shall be combined to compute the total amount of property tax revenue allocated to the jurisdiction with respect to the tax rate area.

(b) The total amount of property tax revenue allocated to each jurisdiction with respect to all tax rate areas as determined pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be added to compute a total amount of property tax revenue for a jurisdiction in all tax rate areas.

(c) Each amount determined pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be divided by the total of all those amounts computed. The quotient determined shall be used to apportion actual property tax collections and shall be known as the “property tax apportionment factors.”

(d) For the 1980–81 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, prior years’ property tax revenues shall be apportioned using the factors determined pursuant to subdivision (c) for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(e) Notwithstanding this section, property tax revenues may be apportioned by tax rate area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)